Tennessee, session 114, SB0941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-17-103(a)(1)(A)(ii), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(ii) In addition to the submission deadline described in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i), a
nonprofit organization seeking to operate an annual event for the benefit of that
organization located in this state may submit an annual event application to the
secretary within five (5) calendar days after the effective date of this act, for the annual
event period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-17-103(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) In addition to the omnibus listing transferred to the clerk of the senate and
the clerk of the house of representatives pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the secretary
shall transfer an additional omnibus listing of any organizations approved pursuant to
subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2026. The list must be transferred in a manner consistent with subdivision
(b)(1) by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time (CDT) within ten (10) calendar
days after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-17-103, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (d)(1)(A)(ii) and (iii), and is further amended by deleting subsection (f).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0941
003118
- 1 -